California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department shall establish a pilot program to provide continuous skilled nursing care as a benefit of the Medi-Cal program, when those services are provided in accordance with an approved federal waiver meeting the requirements of subdivision (b). “Continuous skilled nursing care” means medically necessary care provided by, or under the supervision of, a registered nurse within his or her scope of practice, seven days a week, 24 hours per day, in a health facility participating in the pilot program. This care shall include a minimum of eight hours per day provided by or under the direct supervision of a registered nurse. Each health facility providing continuous skilled nursing care in the pilot program shall have a minimum of one registered nurse or one licensed vocational nurse awake and in the facility at all times.

(b) The department shall submit to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, no later than April 1, 2000, a federal waiver request developed in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services and the Association of Regional Center Agencies, pursuant to Section 1915(b) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)) to provide continuous skilled nursing care services under the pilot program.

(c) (1) The pilot program shall be conducted to explore more flexible models of health facility licensure to provide continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals in the least restrictive health facility setting, and to evaluate the effect of the pilot program on the health, safety, and quality of life of individuals, and the cost-effectiveness of this care. The evaluation shall include a review of the pilot program by an independent agency.

(2) Participation in the pilot program shall include 10 health facilities provided that the facilities meet all eligibility requirements. The facilities shall be approved by the department, in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services and the appropriate regional center agencies, and shall meet the requirements of subdivision (e). Priority shall be given to facilities with four to six beds, to the extent those facilities meet all other eligibility requirements.

(d) Under the pilot program established in this section, a developmentally disabled individual is eligible to receive continuous skilled nursing care if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The developmentally disabled individual meets the criteria as specified in the federal waiver.

(2) The developmentally disabled individual resides in a health facility that meets the provider participation criteria as specified in the federal waiver.

(3) The continuous skilled nursing care services are provided in accordance with the federal waiver.

(4) The continuous skilled nursing care services provided to the developmentally disabled individual do not result in costs that exceed the fiscal limit established in the federal waiver.

(e) A health facility seeking to participate in the pilot program shall provide care for developmentally disabled individuals who require the availability of continuous skilled nursing care, in accordance with the terms of the pilot program. During participation in the pilot program, the health facility shall comply with all the terms and conditions of the federal waiver described in subdivision (b), and shall not be subject to licensure or inspection under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon termination of the pilot program and verification of compliance with Section 1265 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall immediately reinstate the participating health facility’s previous license for the balance of time remaining on the license when the health facility began participation in the pilot program.

(f) The department shall implement this pilot program only to the extent it can demonstrate fiscal neutrality, as required under the terms of the federal waiver, and only if the department has obtained the necessary approvals to implement the pilot program and receives federal financial participation from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(g) In implementing this article, the department may enter into contracts for the provision of essential administration and other services. Contracts entered into under this section may be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(h) This section shall be repealed if and when the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approve a federal waiver pursuant to Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)) or approve a state plan amendment to make this pilot program a permanent program. If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services provide that approval, the Director of Health Care Services shall execute a declaration stating that this approval has been granted. The director shall retain the declaration and this section shall be repealed on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 51.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14496.

(a) Alternate methods of payment for a pilot program may include, but shall not be limited to, a prospectively negotiated reimbursement rate, fee-for-service, retainer, capitation, or other basis.

(b) In order to implement expeditiously the budgeting decisions of the Legislature, the director shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, adopt regulations setting rates payable to providers which reflect such decisions 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act and of any other appropriation which changes the level of funding for Medi-Cal services. The proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Department of Finance five days prior to the date of adoption. With the written approval of the Department of Finance, the director shall adopt such regulations as emergency regulations in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of such act, the adoption of such regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety or general welfare.

(c) In order to implement expeditiously the budgeting decisions of the Legislature, the director and the contractor shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, amend the pilot project contract to reflect such decisions 60 days after the enactment of the Budget Act and of any other appropriation which changes the level of funding for Medi-Cal services. Any approvals, ratifications, reviews, or analyses of such amendments required to be undertaken by any state agency or state department shall be completed within the 60-day period specified in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1516, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14497.

The director shall call a public hearing pursuant to Section 14300 prior to entering into or renewing a pilot program. The director shall make available to the public a statement of objectives, program proposal, pilot program contract, and other details regarding the pilot program not less than five days prior to the public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.5.

(a) (1) In carrying out the intent of this article, the director shall contract for the operation of one local pilot program. Special consideration shall be given to approving a program contracted through county government in Santa Barbara County.

(2) Notwithstanding the limitations contained in Section 14490, the director may enter into, or extend, contracts with the local pilot program in Santa Barbara County pursuant to paragraph (1) for periods that do not exceed three years.

(b) The establishment of a pilot program pursuant to this section shall be contingent upon the availability of state and federal funding. The program shall include the following components:

(1) Local authority for administration, fiscal management, and delivery of services, but not including eligibility determination.

(2) Physician case management.

(3) Cost containment through provider incentives and other means.

(c) The program for the pilot project shall include a plan and budget for delivery of services, administration, and evaluation. During the first year of the pilot program, the amount of the state contract shall equal 95 percent of total projected Medi-Cal expenditures for delivery of services and for administration based on fee-for-service conditions in the program county. During the remaining years of the pilot project Medi-Cal expenditures in the program county shall be no more than 100 percent of total projected expenditures for delivery of services and for administration based on any combination of the following paragraphs:

(1) Relevant prior fee-for-service Medi-Cal experience in the program county.

(2) The fee-for-service Medi-Cal experience in comparable counties or groups of counties.

(3) Medi-Cal experience of the pilot project in the program county if, as determined by the department, the scope, level, and duration of, and expenditures for, any services used in setting the rates under this paragraph would be comparable to fee-for-service conditions were they to exist in the program county and would be more actuarially reliable for use in ratesetting than data available for use in applying paragraph (1) or (2).

The projected total expenditure shall be determined annually according to an acceptable actuarial process. The data elements used by the department shall be shared with the proposed contractor.

(d) The director shall accept or reject the proposal within 30 days after the date of receipt. If a decision is made to reject the proposal, the director shall set forth the reasons for this decision in writing. Upon approval of the proposal, a contract shall be written within 60 days. After signature by the local contractor, the State Department of Health Care Services and the Department of General Services shall execute the contract within 60 days.

(e) The director shall seek the necessary state and federal waivers to enable operation of the program. If the federal waivers for delivery of services under this plan are not granted, the department is under no obligation to contract for implementation of the program.

(f) For purposes of Section 1343 of the Health and Safety Code, the Santa Barbara Regional Health Authority shall be considered to be a county-operated pilot program contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to this article, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, during the period that this contract is in effect, the contractor shall be exempt from the provisions of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, relative to the services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the terms and provisions of the pilot program.

(g) Dental services may be included within the services provided in this pilot program.

(h) Any federal demonstration funding for this pilot program shall be made available to the county within 60 days upon notification of the award without the state retaining any portion not previously specified in the grant application as submitted.

(i) (1) (A) The department may negotiate exclusive contracts and rates with the Santa Barbara Regional Health Authority in the implementation of this section.

(B) Contracts entered into under this article may be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(C) The department shall enter into contracts pursuant to this article, and shall be bound by the terms and conditions related to the rates negotiated by the negotiator.

(2) The department shall implement this subdivision to the extent that the following apply:

(A) Its implementation does not revise the status of the pilot program as a federal demonstration project.

(B) Existing federal waivers apply to the pilot program as revised by this subdivision, or the federal government extends the applicability of the existing federal waivers or authorizes additional federal waivers for the implementation of the program.

(3) The implementation of this subdivision shall not affect the pilot program’s having met any of the requirements of Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1175) of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code and this division applicable to the pilot program with respect to the negotiations of contracts and rates by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 93.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.6.

(a) The Santa Barbara Regional Health Authority may arrange with out-of-county Selective Provider Contracting Program hospitals that have negotiated hospital contracts and per diem rates under Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 14165) of Chapter 7, to provide medically justified emergency services or to provide specialized hospital services not available within Santa Barbara County to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who reside in Santa Barbara County. The authority may arrange medically justified inpatient hospital services with out-of-county program hospitals for those beneficiaries whose county of residence for purposes of eligibility determination is Santa Barbara, but who for medical or legal reasons
 physically reside in a county other than Santa Barbara.

(b) The out-of-county program hospitals shall not charge the authority more than their program negotiated rates when providing hospital services to authority patients under this section, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) In cases where an out-of-county program hospital can demonstrate that the cost of the services it is rendering to authority patients was not contemplated in the case mix and acuity assumptions on which the program rates are based, the program hospital and the authority shall negotiate in good faith equitable rates for payment for the provision of hospital services to authority patients. The established program rate shall serve as the base for those negotiations.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any records maintained by the authority that would enable a determination to be made regarding rates negotiated pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 14165) of Chapter 7, shall be exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) The authority shall establish guidelines to ensure that these rates are maintained as confidential records and that access to these records is restricted.

(3) The authority shall submit the established guidelines to the department for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 458.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Medi-Cal At-Risk Fiscal Intermediaries [14499.7. - 14499.77.]

14499.7.

The department may contract with one or more fiscal intermediaries in order to pay for benefits authorized under this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000). Contracts entered into pursuant to this article may be awarded on a bid or nonbid basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.71.

For the purposes of this article, “fiscal intermediary” means an entity that agrees to pay for covered services provided to Medi-Cal eligibles in exchange for a premium, subscription charge, or capitation payment; to assume an underwriting risk; and is licensed by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 54.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.73.

A contract entered into under this article shall provide that a fiscal intermediary meets both of the following criteria:

(a) The fiscal intermediary shall provide or arrange for an adequate number of primary care physicians and supportive specialty care physicians.

(b) The fiscal intermediary shall implement a management and information reporting system in order to determine the costs of each type of health care service rendered to Medi-Cal recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.74.

In determining the capitated rates to be paid to a fiscal intermediary during the first year of contracting under this article, the department shall utilize an acceptable actuarial process and historical data concerning Medi-Cal recipients in the geographical area which will, or is being, served by the fiscal intermediary. During the remaining years of the contract with the fiscal intermediary, the department shall utilize data concerning Medi-Cal expenditures for delivery of services based on the fee-for-service experience in comparable geographic areas. The capitated rates shall not exceed the total per capita amount (including the cost of adjustments to provide actuarial equivalence) which would be payable for all services and requirements covered under the fiscal intermediary contract adopted pursuant to this article if all those services and requirements were to be furnished to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program provided for by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.75.

A fiscal intermediary may contract for the provision of services with any provider who would be eligible to provide services if services were to be provided on a fee-for-service basis without the use of a fiscal intermediary pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14499.77.

All services, except those specified for exclusion by the department, received by Medi-Cal recipients residing in the geographical area served by the fiscal intermediary shall be paid for by the fiscal intermediary. Services shall be provided only by providers which have entered into agreements with the fiscal intermediary, unless authorized by the fiscal intermediary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Family Planning [14500. - 14512.]

14500.

An Office of Family Planning shall be established within the State Department of Health Services. The Office of Family Planning shall be under the control of an executive officer who shall be known as the Coordinator of the Office of Family Planning. The coordinator shall be appointed by the State Director of Health Services and shall be an individual with training and experience in family planning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14500.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that family planning includes, but is not limited to, an effective means to improve reproductive health by disease prevention and treatment, to reduce the incidence of unintended pregnancies, and to reduce the demand for abortions. It is the intent of the Legislature that no family planning shall be expended other than for the services enumerated in this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that no funds received pursuant to this chapter be used for abortions or services ancillary to abortions.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Family planning” means the process of establishing objectives for the number and spacing of children, and selecting the means by which those objectives may be achieved. These means include a broad range of acceptable and effective methods and services to limit or enhance fertility, including contraceptive methods, natural family planning, abstinence methods, and the management of infertility. Family planning services include preconceptional counseling, maternal and fetal health counseling, and general reproductive health care, including diagnosis and treatment of infections and conditions, including cancer, that threaten reproductive capability, and other services as described in Section 14503, except for abortions and services ancillary to abortions as prohibited in Section 14509. Family planning does not include abortion, pregnancy testing solely for the purposes of referral for abortion or services ancillary to abortions, or pregnancy care which is not incident to the diagnosis of a
 pregnancy, except as otherwise provided for in this chapter.

(2) “Abortion as a method of family planning” means the deliberate choice of abortion over other methods to limit the number, gender, and spacing of children, including, but not limited to, contraception, abstinence, and natural family planning methods.

(3) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) “Director” means the Director of Health Care Services.

(5) “Grantee” means an agency, institution, or organization approved by the department to provide family planning services pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 116.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.

The Office of Family Planning has all of the following functions, powers, and duties:

(a) To make available to citizens of the state of childbearing age comprehensive medical knowledge, assistance, and services relating to the planning of families.

(b) To consult with state and local agencies that provide or administer family planning services and to participate in the formulation of regulations and other policy decisions governing the provision or administration of family planning services pursuant to state law or regulation.

(c) To establish goals and priorities for all state agencies providing or administering family planning services.

(d) To coordinate all family planning services and related programs conducted or administered by state agencies with the federal government so as to maximize the availability of these services by utilizing all available federal funds.

(e) To conduct a survey of all of the existing facilities within the state having to do with family planning and infertility and the rendering of advice and assistance on birth control techniques and information.

(f) To evaluate all existing programs and to establish in each county a viable program for the dispensation of family planning, infertility, and birth control information and techniques.

(g) To develop and administer scientific investigation into problems of infertility and existing and new family planning and birth
 control techniques.

(h) To survey, evaluate, and establish programs of professional education and training for physicians, nurses, medical and nursing students, and other health care practitioners in rendering advice on family planning, infertility, and birth control techniques and information.

(i) To enter into agreements with, and award grants to, individuals, colleges, universities, associations, corporations, municipalities, and other units of government as may be deemed necessary and advisable to carry out the general intent and purposes of this chapter, which may provide for payment by the state within the limit of funds available for material, equipment, and services.

(j) To post annual reports on its internet website, including, but not limited to, the subjects specified
 in subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive.

(k) To annually update and analyze family planning data. The data shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Client number.

(2) Ethnicity.

(3) Family size.

(4) Method.

(5) Family income.

(6) Service type.

(7) Birthdate.

(8) Total billing amount.

(9) Pay source.

(10) Date of visit.

(11) Site number.

(12) County of residence.

(13) Updated estimates of women in need of subsidized family planning services from the federal government, when available, for all Office of Family Planning clinical service grantees by county of service, as well as statewide totals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 64.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.5.

The Office of Family Planning shall develop and implement a sliding fee schedule for family planning services provided to individuals under this chapter. The fee schedule shall be based on family size and income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 69, Sec. 26.   Effective June 17, 1981.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 35 of Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.

The Office of Family Planning may, to the extent funds are available, and not more frequently than once each year, advance up to 25 percent of the yearly allocation to an individual or entity to which it has awarded a grant, pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 14501, to provide material, equipment, and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.

(a) Family planning services shall be offered to all former, current, or potential recipients of childbearing age (as provided by Public Law 92-603) and provided to all eligible individuals who voluntarily request the services. The services shall be offered and provided without regard to marital status, age, or parenthood. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the furnishing of these family planning services shall not require the consent of anyone other than the person who is to receive them. Within the meaning of this section, the term “former, current, or potential recipient” means all persons eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and all persons eligible for public social services for which federal reimbursement is available under the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), except that the term “potential recipients” includes all persons in a family where current social, economic, and health conditions of the family indicate that the family would likely become a recipient of financial assistance within the next five years.

(b) Family planning services shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Medical treatment and procedures defined as family planning services under the published Medi-Cal scope of benefits.

(2) Medical contraceptive services such as diagnosis, treatment, supplies, and followup.

(3) Informational and educational services.

(4) Facilitating services such as transportation and child care services needed to attend clinic or other appointments.

(5) Screening for chlamydia.

(c) To the extent the services under this section are not available under the Medi-Cal program, they shall be provided by a grantee pursuant to a grant awarded by the Office of Family Planning. These grants shall include to the maximum extent possible, cooperative funding and other financial arrangements that permit maximum use of available federal funds. All grants awarded by the Office of Family Planning shall be exempt from Division 2 (commencing with Section 1100) of the Public Contract Code. Information and referral services only shall be available to all other families and children.

(d) As the single state agency responsible for the state plan under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397 et seq.), the State Department of Social Services may provide family planning services pursuant to a purchase of services agreement with the department from funds appropriated for those services. The agreement shall authorize the Office of Family Planning to implement a sliding fee schedule for family planning services provided to clients pursuant to Title XX of the federal Social Security Act in accordance with Section 14501.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.5.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “AIDS” means acquired immune deficiency syndrome.

(2) “Human immunodeficiency virus” or “HIV” means the etiologic virus of AIDS.

(3) “HIV test” means “HIV test” as defined in Section 120775 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The purpose of this article is to ensure that state-funded family planning programs offer AIDS information and referral services to their client population.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that family planning clients learn how to prevent the transmission of HIV, and that they take steps to prevent its transmission.

(d) For purposes of this section, “clients” shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) New clients to a family planning program.

(2) Clients making annual visits to a family planning program.

(3) Clients seeking pregnancy testing or family planning services.

(4) Clients seeking diagnosis and treatment for sexually transmitted diseases.

(e) Any family planning program that has a grant from the Office of Family Planning to provide family planning services shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide brochures or other written materials to family planning clients that describe the high-risk conditions and behaviors for becoming infected with HIV and ways to prevent the transmission of HIV infection. To the maximum extent possible, the brochure or other written materials provided by any family planning program shall be culturally relevant and appropriate to the client populations served by the programs.

(2) Provide, as needed, family planning clients with information about and referrals to local confidential or anonymous testing and counseling sites, AIDS education programs, and other supportive services.

(f) Brochures and information required pursuant to subdivision (e) may be incorporated into existing information and health education programs provided by a family planning program.

(g) The department shall make every effort to obtain brochures and other written materials from existing resources. Local family planning programs are encouraged to supplement the brochures with other available resources, to the extent that they deem necessary and appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 641, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.

(a) The Male Involvement Program shall be a continuing program within the Office of Family Planning with the goal of reducing teenage pregnancy through promoting primary prevention skills and motivation in adolescent boys and young men. In order to accomplish this goal, the program shall assist local programs to do all of the following:

(1) Increase community and individual awareness regarding the importance of the roles and responsibilities of adolescent boys and young men in the reduction of teenage pregnancies.

(2) Reinforce community values that support these roles and responsibilities.

(3) Increase knowledge, skills, and motivation of at-risk adolescent boys and young adult men in order to actively promote their role in reducing teenage pregnancies.

(b) Grants shall be made available to qualifying public or private nonprofit providers for implementation of the Male Involvement Program.

(c) This section shall be implemented to the extent funding is made available through the federal government, or in the annual Budget Act or another state statute, or any combination of any sources of funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 710.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.1.

(a) The Community Challenge Grants Program shall be a continuing program within the Office of Family Planning with the goal of reducing the number of teenage pregnancies and teenage single parents, and promoting responsible parenting and the involvement of the biological father in economic, social, and emotional support of his children.

(b) The program may target the following specific population groups:

(1) Presexually active adolescents.

(2) Sexually active adolescents.

(3) Pregnant and parenting teens.

(4) Parents and families.

(5) Adults at risk for unwed motherhood or absentee fatherhood.

(c) School-based programs that include sexuality education shall comply with the requirements of Section 51553 of the Education Code relative to the content of sex education courses, Section 51201.5 of the Education Code, which governs HIV/AIDS prevention, and Section 220 of the Education Code, which prohibits discrimination in schools based on sexual orientation.

(d) Grants shall be made available to qualifying community-based nonprofit organizations and priority shall be given to those organizations with community-based partnerships that have developed effective local prevention programs.

(e) This section shall be implemented to the extent funding is made available through the federal government, or in the annual Budget Act or another state statute, or any combination of any sources of funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.2.

(a) The TeenSMART Program shall be a continuing program within the Office of Family Planning with the goal of reducing teenage pregnancies and reducing the incidence of sexually transmitted infections among sexually active teens through enhanced reproductive health care counseling, pregnancy prevention education, and sexually transmitted infection risk reduction efforts for adolescents accessing Family PACT TeenSMART clinics.

(b) The services to be provided through TeenSMART shall include counseling services and outreach in local communities to assist teens who are at high risk of pregnancy to access clinical family planning services. Outreach activities may include, but are not limited to, establishing referral networks, providing information about clinic services to teens in either formal group presentations or small group education and counseling sessions, and one-on-one education and counseling sessions.

(c) Grants shall be made available to qualified public or private nonprofit providers for implementation of the TeenSMART Program.

(d) This section shall be implemented to the extent funding is made available through the federal government, or in the annual Budget Act or another state statute, or any combination of any sources of funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 643, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.3.

(a) The Information and Education Program shall be a continuing program within the Office of Family Planning with the goal of decreasing teenage pregnancies through educational programs that equip teens at high risk for pregnancy with the knowledge, understanding, and behavioral skills necessary to make responsible decisions regarding at-risk behavior.

(b) (1) The program shall target youths in a variety of settings, including, but not limited to, schools, juvenile justice facilities, community-based settings, social services and youth agencies, and foster care programs.

(2) The program shall also focus on parents of high-risk youths and other adults responsible for serving youths at risk in an effort to assist them with effective tools for counseling at-risk youth regarding responsible behavior.

(c) Priority for funding under this program shall be given to the following:

(1) Programs that will increase youths’ knowledge and ability to deal responsibly with their own sexuality and the social pressures affecting them.

(2) Programs that will enhance the ability of parents and other parenting adults to fulfill their roles as the primary sex educators of their children.

(d) Grants shall be made available to qualified public or private nonprofit providers for implementation of the Information and Education Program.

(e) This section shall be implemented to the extent funding is made available through the federal government, or in the annual Budget Act or another state statute, or any combination of any sources of funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 643, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14505.

The State Department of Health Services succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the Department of Benefit Payments with respect to the processing, audit, and payment of claims for family planning services under this part to the extent they are performed pursuant to the state plan under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Medi-Cal). The State Department of Social Services succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the Department of Benefit Payments with respect to the processing, audit, and payment of claims for family planning services under this part to the extent they are performed pursuant to the state plan under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act. Moneys, funds, and appropriations available to the Department of Benefit Payments for the purposes of this section shall be made available to the State Department of Health Services and to the State Department of Social Services by the Director of Benefit Payments for the purposes of this section after such moneys, funds, and appropriations have been appropriated to or received by the Department of Benefit Payments.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10053.5 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.

The State Department of Health Services shall have the possession and control of all records, papers, equipment, and supplies held for the benefit or use of the Director of Benefit Payments in the performance of his duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the State Department of Health Services by Section 14505. The State Department of Social Services shall have possession and control of all records, papers, equipment, and supplies held for the benefit or use of the Director of Benefit Payments in the performance of his duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the State Department of Social Services by Section 14505.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10053.6 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

14507.

All officers and employees of the Director of Benefit Payments who on the operative date of this section are serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of a function vested in the State Department of Health Services by Section 14505 shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Services. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the State Department of Health Services pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10053.7 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)